Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 1

Development Districts

13-14-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Development District Act of 1965.”

Acts 1965, ch. 241, § 1; 1969, ch. 239, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-1401.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1986, ch. 820 contained the Municipal Development Authority Act of 1986 containing an alternative method of municipal planning; however, this act was amended to be eventually applicable only to Johnson City and is listed in the Uncodified Public Acts Index.

The Greater Nashville Regional Council, established in title 64, ch. 7, supersedes the Mid-Cumberland Council of Governments, and the Mid-Cumberland Development District. See § 64-7-101.

Cross-References. Local neighborhood model development corporations, title 13, ch. 13.

13-14-102. Creation of districts.

From and after the time when the department of economic and community development has progressed to the stage of preparing a general plan for development of the state as provided for in §§ 13-16-103 — 13-16-105, which includes at least a delineation of regions deemed viable to the economic development of the state, then the department is empowered, in cooperation with counties, municipalities and local development agencies, and in accordance with the conditions and procedures specified in this chapter, to create development districts for such regions, such districts to encompass one (1) or more counties or parts of counties, such that are conducive to efficient planning and orderly economic development of the state.

A board established as hereinafter provided for shall be responsible for area-wide planning in its district.

Acts 1965, ch. 241, § 2; 1969, ch. 239, § 2; 1972, ch. 542, § 11; T.C.A., § 13-1402; Acts 1995, ch. 501, § 5.

13-14-103. Purposes of chapter.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the various counties and cities be provided the most effective and efficient means of organizing themselves on a regional basis for the purpose of carrying on general and comprehensive planning and development activities, such that would provide coordinated, efficient and orderly economic development of the state. It is the further intent that local governments through such regional agencies be guided and assisted in making maximum use of federal, state and local programs designed to stimulate economic development and utilization of resources. It is the further intent of this chapter that the planning function of government be separated from the plan implementation function, leaving to existing county, municipal and state governments and their instrumentalities the carrying out of all plans for physical, economic and resource development, as provided for under existing laws. However, it is the intent of the general assembly that development districts may perform the implementation function with respect to the public guardianship program created by title 34, chapter 7.

It is the further intent of this chapter that, in order to ensure the success of regional planning and development as herein defined, the state may provide minimum financial assistance on a matching basis to such boards for purposes of staffing and providing other planning and administrative services, in accordance with the state's policy of furthering the economic development of the state.

Acts 1965, ch. 241, § 3; T.C.A., § 13-1403; Acts 1990, ch. 654, § 1.

13-14-104. Membership of boards.

The membership of boards created under this chapter shall consist of the county mayor of each county within the district, the mayor of each municipality within the district, the chief executive officer of any metropolitan government within the district, one (1) representative from a local agency in each county dealing with problems of industrial development or promotion appointed by the county mayor, and one (1) state senator and one (1) state representative whose senatorial or representative districts lie wholly or in part in the development district. The senator member shall be selected by the senators whose districts are wholly or in part within the development district. Senators and representatives shall serve on such boards for two (2) years or until they leave the general assembly, whichever occurs first. Senators whose districts lie wholly or partly within the development district shall meet at the call of the senior senator among those affected, for the purpose of selecting a member of the development district board, and representatives shall meet at the call of the senior representative for that purpose. Membership on such boards shall be for four (4) years or until the expiration of the term of the official by whom such representative was appointed, whichever occurs first. Members are subject to reappointment. The representative of each county and city government as indicated above may be chosen from an existing city or county planning commission. The board may appoint an executive committee to act for it and determine the authority of such committee. No member of the general assembly shall receive any additional compensation for such member's service on a board.

Acts 1965, ch. 241, § 4; 1975, ch. 324, § 1; 1978, ch. 737, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; Acts 1979, ch. 381, § 3; T.C.A., § 13-1404; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Attorney General Opinions. Power to appoint county development district representative, OAG 98-014, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (1/9/98).

13-14-105. Procedure for creation.

Upon delineation of regions deemed viable to the economic development of the state as provided for in this chapter, the department of economic and community development shall notify the chief executive officer of each municipal and county government in such region proposed for planning and development, and hold a public hearing with such officers assembled to explain the advantages of economic development, and otherwise solicit an expression of interest about the creation of such district and board as provided for in this chapter.

No district shall be created without the consent of at least a three-fourths (¾) majority of counties as represented by the county mayor, and a three-fourths (¾) majority of municipalities as represented by the mayor.

Membership in these districts shall be by consent only and any municipality or county may, by majority vote of the governing body, cease to become a member of the district.

Acts 1965, ch. 241, § 5; 1972, ch. 542, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 13-1405; Acts 1995, ch. 501, § 5; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

13-14-106. Powers and duties of boards.

Each board created under this chapter has the authority to:

Organize itself into a public body, elect its officers, and adopt bylaws for purposes of carrying out functions authorized under this chapter;

Receive and expend funds from any sources for staffing, for research, planning, coordination, economic development, demonstration projects, and other activities deemed necessary to promote the efficient, harmonious and economic development of the district; and receive grants from private foundations for purposes of research and for demonstration projects oriented to human, physical and natural resources utilization;

Contract with local, state and federal agencies, and with consultants for services to be provided;

Prepare broad plans for the economic development of the district, including, but not limited to, comprehensive land use and plans for physical development. Such plans shall be made with the purpose of guiding and accomplishing a coordinated, adjusted, efficient and economic development of the district which will, in accordance with present and future needs and resources, best promote the health, safety, morals, order, convenience, prosperity and welfare of the citizens, as well as efficiency and economy in the process of development, including distribution of population, urbanization, and the uses of land and resources for trade, industry, recreation, forestry, agriculture and tourism, and will tend to create conditions favorable to transportation, health, safety and otherwise promote the general welfare of the citizens. Such plans may include the design and layout of industrial parks and feasibility studies for extension of utilities and services to areas deemed suitable for industrial development;

Cooperate and coordinate its activities with local and state planning agencies and other districts in developing and implementing plans for development;

Cooperate and coordinate its activities with the federal agencies responsible for developing natural, human and physical resources of the district; recommend projects which will enhance the development of all resources, to be carried out through existing governmental units or through a combination of these as applicable under state laws, including, but not limited to, the former Area Redevelopment Program [terminated], the Appalachian program and the former Economic Opportunity Act [repealed];

Cooperate with local and regional finance companies in assembling financial resources for commercial, industrial and other development;

Compile, prepare, publish and disseminate information about the economic resources of the district and about sub-areas;

Encourage and assist in the creation of private and semipublic, nonprofit organizations as needed and under existing laws of the state for carrying out specific projects and programs initiated under federal and state laws;

Enter into compacts or contractual arrangements with planning agencies of other adjoining or neighboring states, for the purpose of preparing joint-comprehensive plans for development of a broader area or region. Boards are hereby expressly authorized to expend funds for interstate planning, notwithstanding the fact that in doing so portions of such funds may be used for planning work outside of the state boundary;

Contract with the commission on aging and disability to operate the program established by title 34, chapter 7; and

Have and exercise other authority as deemed necessary to further and promote the orderly and economic development of the state.

Each governing board operating under this chapter shall:

Jointly adopt statewide uniform travel regulations subject to the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration and shall reimburse its officers and employees for official travel in conformance with such regulations;

Develop a system of competitive bidding on purchases of supplies and equipment and other contracts and shall submit the written procedures governing such system to the state procurement commission for approval;

Develop written personnel procedures to be filed with the commissioner of finance and administration for the hiring, promotion, demotion and dismissal of all employees, and shall include an employee compensation plan based on a salary comparability analysis which takes into account state salary schedules, local government salary schedules, and regional private market variations; and

Submit, annually, to the department of economic and community development, or such other office as may be directed by the governor, a work program and budget, together with such other information as may be requested.

Acts 1965, ch. 241, § 6; 1976, ch. 665, §§ 1-3; 1979, ch. 381, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-1406; Acts 1989, ch. 196, § 1; 1990, ch. 654, § 2; 1995, ch. 501, § 5; 2011, ch. 295, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. For federal acts referred to in this section, the Area Redevelopment Program, formerly compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 2501 et seq., has terminated persuant to former 42 U.S.C § 2525, effective August 31, 1965; the Appalachian Program, was enacted as Public Law 89-4, passed March 9, 1965; and the Economic Opportunity Act, formerly compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 2701 et seq. was repealed, effective October 1, 1981.

The term “commission on aging and disability” was substituted for “commission on aging” pursuant to Acts 2001, ch. 397.

Attorney General Opinions. Power to appoint county development district representative, OAG 98-014, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (1/9/98).

13-14-107. Limitations on power of board.

The following limitations, in addition to any other limitations specifically provided herein, shall apply to boards created under this chapter:

All plans shall be advisory only;

No authority is hereby granted to enact zoning ordinances or subdivision standards;

No authority is hereby granted such that would supplant or in any way interfere or supersede the planning and development authority granted cities and counties under other applicable state statutes;

Plans prepared under this chapter must reflect goals and objectives for harmonious development of the district, and, in the case of highways, must be in accordance and coordinated with plans of the department of transportation, and with plans of the department of economic and community development;

Plans prepared under this chapter shall be transmitted to all governmental bodies in the district, and these may be adopted as their own for purposes of planning and development;

No authority is hereby granted for the exercise of the power of eminent domain, nor for engaging in construction projects;

No authority is hereby granted to regulate the agricultural or other use of land; and

Only duly appointed members of the board, or persons duly designated pursuant to § 6-54-112, may vote.

Notwithstanding the limitation of subdivision (a)(6) which prohibits the board from engaging in construction projects, the board is authorized to construct a building for its own use. The board is authorized to borrow such funds it deems necessary to fund the construction of a building for its own use, and may mortgage or otherwise pledge its real property or other assets to secure such a loan.

Acts 1965, ch. 241, § 7; 1972, ch. 542, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1979, ch. 381, § 2; T.C.A., § 13-1407; Acts 1990, ch. 1008, § 1; 1991, ch. 250, § 1; 1995, ch. 501, § 5; 2008, ch. 990, § 1; 2010, ch. 730, § 1.

13-14-108. Uniform accounting system.

The comptroller of the treasury is directed to develop a uniform accounting system conforming to generally accepted accounting principles for the governing boards operating under this chapter.

Such uniform accounting system shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration. Upon such approval, each development district shall establish and maintain the uniform accounting system.

No state appropriation shall be released to a development district until such district has established the required accounting system.

Acts 1976, ch. 665, § 5; T.C.A., § 13-1413.

13-14-109. Member voting after term of office expired.

If a member of a board created under this chapter participates in a vote of such board after such member's term of office has expired, no state funds shall be released to or expended by such board until such time as the board meets and rescinds any votes in which such member has participated and reconsiders its action with a lawfully constituted board.

Acts 1979, ch. 381, § 4; T.C.A., § 13-1414.

13-14-110. Regional agencies under special acts.

Nothing in this chapter shall in any way limit or infringe upon the statutory authority granted by law to the Beech River watershed development authority, the department of environment and conservation, or the Upper Duck River development agency as the same have been heretofore created by the general assembly; nor shall any provision of this chapter restrict or limit the functions of any similar tributary watershed area development authority which may be hereafter created by the general assembly.

Acts 1965, ch. 241, § 8; T.C.A., § 13-1408; Acts 1996, ch. 816, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 816, which abolished the Tennessee Elk River development agency, provided in § 2 that all powers, duties, contractual obligations and functions of the agency are transferred to the department of environment and conservation.

Cross-References. Beech River watershed development authority, title 64, ch. 1, part 1.

Upper Duck River development agency, title 64, ch. 1, part 6.

Department of environment and conservation, title 4, ch. 3, part 5.

13-14-111. Financing.

It is the intent of the state to assist financially with the development of regional plans for economic development and for coordination of activities thereunder. The board for the Memphis area association of governments, composed of the Fayette, Lauderdale, Shelby, and Tipton counties and the municipalities located within those counties, has been created as provided in this chapter and when the local governments have indicated a willingness to contribute financially by adopting a budget requiring a certain per capita assessment, the state shall be authorized to match the local contributions according to subdivision (c)(3).

The local contributions to the Memphis area association of governments shall be based upon, in the case of counties, an amount not to exceed twenty-one cents (21¢) per capita based on the latest decennial census, one half (½) of which may be contributed by local incorporated cities or by other private, public or semipublic bodies; provided, that no county shall be required to contribute more than twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500) annually. The aggregate of such funds may also be used for purposes of matching various federal programs of assistance for planning and development. Counties and municipalities may participate independently of each other in financing the activities of the board. Cities and counties are specifically authorized to appropriate and expend funds for carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

It is the intent of the state to assist financially with the development of regional plans for economic development and other regional plans, activities, and programs authorized by this chapter and other statutes and for coordination of activities thereunder. The regional plans, activities and programs shall be for the benefit of and for the local governments of this state and, as appropriate, the state government and the citizens of Tennessee. The boards of the eight (8) other development districts established as the First Tennessee development district, the East Tennessee development district, the Southeast Tennessee development district, the Upper Cumberland development district, the South Central Tennessee development district, the Southwest Tennessee development district, the Greater Nashville regional council and the Northwest Tennessee development district have been created as provided in this chapter and title 64, chapter 7.

When the local governments have indicated a willingness to contribute financially to the development districts by adopting a budget establishing a certain per capita assessment, the state shall include in its budget under the department of economic and community development, or its state functional equivalent, a separate line item for the funding of the activities of the development districts. Any appropriations of state funds made to the development districts by the general assembly shall not be reduced, except in conjunction with an across the board percentage reduction applicable to multiple state government departments and agencies.

The amount of state funding to each development district shall be based upon the per capita assessment established by the individual development district boards. The per capita assessment and corresponding state funding levels for the nine (9) development districts are as follows:

Per Capita Assessment Annual State Appropriation

1-5 cents $40,000

6-10 cents 70,000

11-15 cents 100,000

16-20 cents 150,000

21-30 cents 180,000

31 - to an amount over 31 cents as may be approved by the individual development district board 200,000

For calculating the per capita assessments of the development districts in subsection (c), the board of a development district may utilize either the population counts from the latest yearly population estimates or from the decennial census figures of each city, town, metropolitan government, and county that is located in and is a member government of the development district, as reported by the United States department of commerce, bureau of the census or its federal functional equivalent. The aggregate of the funds generated by the per capita assessment may be used for the purposes of matching various federal and state programs, grants and contracts for planning, programs and activities undertaken by the development districts. The aggregate of state funds appropriated to the development districts may be used for the purpose of matching various federal programs, grants and contracts for planning, programs and activities undertaken by the development districts. Any funds generated by either the per capita assessment or the state appropriation may be utilized by the development districts to pay the operating and administrative costs of the district. Cities, towns, metropolitan governments, and counties may participate in the per capita assessment funding of the development districts in which they are located independently of each other. In order to promote regional cooperation and planning, counties may pay the per capita assessment of any of the cities or towns within the county's political boundary. Cities, towns, metropolitan governments and counties are specifically authorized to appropriate and expend funds for carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1965, ch. 241, § 9; 1968, ch. 613, § 1; 1969, ch. 165, § 1; 1972, ch. 830, § 1; 1973, ch. 271, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 13-1409; Acts 1985, ch. 429, § 1; 2007, ch. 521, §§ 1-4; 2013, ch. 456, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2019, ch. 404, § 2 provided that notwithstanding this section, appropriations to the Department of Economic and Community Development for economic development district grants are authorized to be reduced in the amount of $174,000 (recurring) for the transfer of such amount to the Tennessee Commission on Children and Youth for the sole purpose of making a grant in such amount to the Tennessee Court Appointed Special Advocate Association.

13-14-112. Reporting and auditing.

Each board operating under this chapter shall prepare an annual report of its activities through June 30 of each year, and submit a copy of such report to the governor, the general assembly, and the commissioner of finance and administration.

The annual reports and all books of accounts and financial records of all funds received by grant, contract or otherwise from state, local, or federal sources shall be subject to audit annually by the comptroller of the treasury. The audit may be performed by a licensed independent public accountant selected by the board and approved by the comptroller of the treasury. The cost of any audit shall be paid by the development district.

The comptroller of the treasury shall ensure that audits are prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and determine if the audits meet minimum audit standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury. No audit may be accepted as meeting the requirements of this section until approved by the comptroller of the treasury.

All audits shall be completed as soon as practicable after the end of the fiscal year of the development district. One (1) copy of each audit shall be furnished to each member of the board of the development district and the comptroller of the treasury. Copies of each audit shall also be made available to the press.

All audits performed by the internal audit staff of any such development district shall be conducted in accordance with the standards established by the comptroller of the treasury pursuant to § 4-3-304(9).

Acts 1965, ch. 241, § 10; 1976, ch. 665, § 4; 1978, ch. 728, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-1410; Acts 1984, ch. 794, § 8.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

13-14-113. Appropriated funds subject to approval — Matching funds required.

Funds appropriated to implement this chapter are subject to the approval of the governor and the commissioner of finance and administration.

Such approval shall be given only after review by the department of economic and community development of the annual work program developed by the district to assure that such program is in accordance with the development plans of the state.

These funds or portions thereof shall be paid only upon certification by the appropriate official of each board that matching local funds are available.

Acts 1965, ch. 241, § 11; 1969, ch. 165, § 2; T.C.A., § 13-1411; Acts 1995, ch. 501, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

13-14-114. Bond requirements.

Any board member, executive committee member, employee officer, or any other authorized person of a development district, who receives public funds, has authority to make expenditures from public funds, or has access to any public funds, is hereby required to give bond to be made payable to the state of Tennessee with such sureties as hereinafter provided. Such bond is to be conditioned in all cases in which a different condition is not prescribed, upon the faithful discharge of the duties of such office, employment or other authorized activity in which such person is engaged during the time such person continues therein, or in the discharge of any part of such duties.

Such official bond shall be executed in the same form as that prescribed by § 8-19-101, for county and state officials and employees.

Effective July 1, 2013, the minimum amount of such required bond shall be determined from the amount of revenues handled by the respective development district as reported in the last audit approved by the comptroller of the treasury. The minimum amount of the bond shall be based on revenues as follows:

Four percent (4%) of the revenues up to three million dollars ($3,000,000); and

Two percent (2%) of the excess over three million dollars ($3,000,000) shall be added.

The amounts indicated in subdivisions (c)(1)(A) and (B) shall be cumulative.

All such official bonds shall be signed by authorized individuals of a corporate surety, and such corporation shall be duly licensed to do business in this state as a surety.

The official bonds required under this section are hereby required to be recorded in the office of the register of deeds where the office of the development district is located and transmitted to the office of the county clerk in the same county for safekeeping.

No examination or certification of any of such bonds shall be required in this section.

Provisions for bonds of all state and county officers set forth in title 8, chapter 19, shall also govern the bonds of all persons covered under this section, so far as title 8, chapter 19, is not inconsistent with this section.

The respective development district shall pay the premiums for such bonds.

Acts 1976, ch. 665, § 6; T.C.A., § 13-1412; Acts 2013, ch. 315, §§ 25, 26.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 315, § 31 provided that the act, which amended subsections (c) and (e), shall apply to the renewal or obtaining an official bond for any bonding after April 29, 2013.